Colorado statutes. TITLE 40 Utilities
ARTICLE 12
COMMERCIAL CARRIERS - MOTOR VEHICLES

40-12-101 to 40-12-114. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 78:

Entire article repealed, p. 521, § 8, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 10 of chapter 115, C.R.S. 1963. For amendments to this article prior to its repeal in 1978, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.